da: Hjem og have > Husholdningsartikler > Skraldopbevaring > Beholdere til farligt affald: Beholdere til smittefarligt affald; Beholdere til kemisk affald; Beholdere til farmaceutisk affald; Beholdere til radioaktivt affald; Beholdere til skarpe genstande
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Битови консумативи > Ограничаване на отпадъците > Контейнери за опасни отпадъци: Контейнер за биологично опасни отпадъци; Контейнер за химически отпадъци; Контейнер за фармацевтични отпадъци; Контейнер за радиоактивни отпадъци; Контейнер за медицински игли
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Potrepštine za kućanstvo > Spremnici za otpad > Kontejneri za opasni otpad: Kontejneri za opasni biološki otpad; Kontejneri za kemijski otpad; Kontejneri za farmaceutski otpad; Kontejneri za radioaktivni otpad; Kontejneri za oštre predmete
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Ev Sarf Malzemeleri > Çöp Muhafazası > Tehlikeli Atık Konteynerleri: Biyolojik Tehlikeli Atık Kapları; Kimyasal Atık Kapları; İlaç Atığı Yönetim Ürünleri; Radyoaktif Atık Kapları; Kesici-Delici Atık Kapları
nb: Hjem og hage > Husholdningsartikler > Avfallsoppbevaring > Beholdere for farlig avfall: Beholdere til biologisk avfall; Beholdere til kjemisk avfall; Beholdere til farmasøytisk avfall; Beholdere til radioaktivt avfall; Sharps-beholdere
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > 日用品 > ゴミ箱用品 > 有害廃棄物用コンテナ: バイオハザード廃棄物容器; 化学廃棄物容器; 医薬品廃棄物容器; 放射性廃棄物容器; シャープスコンテナ
sv: Hem och trädgård > Hushållsutrustning > Avfallshantering > Behållare för farligt avfall: Behållare för biologiskt riskavfall; Behållare för kemiskt avfall; Behållare för läkemedelsavfall; Behållare för radioaktivt avfall; Behållare för stickande och skärande avfall
vi: Nhà và vườn > Sản phẩm gia dụng > Đồ chứa rác > Dụng cụ chứa rác thải nguy hiểm: Thùng rác cho chất thải nguy hại sinh học; Thùng rác hóa chất; Thùng rác cho chất thải dược phẩm; Thùng rác cho chất thải phóng xạ; Thùng rác cho vật sắc nhọn
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Produse de uz casnic > Depozitarea deșeurilor > Containere pentru deșeuri periculoase: Recipiente pentru deșeuri biologice periculoase; Recipiente pentru deșeuri chimice; Recipiente pentru deșeuri farmaceutice; Recipiente pentru deșeuri radioactive; Recipiente pentru obiecte ascuțite
en: Home & Garden > Household Supplies > Waste Containment > Hazardous Waste Containers: Biohazard Waste Containers; Chemical Waste Containers; Pharmaceutical Waste Containers; Radioactive Waste Containers; Sharps Containers
it: Casa e giardino > Forniture domestiche > Contenimento rifiuti > Contenitori rifiuti pericolosi: Cassa rifiuti a rischio biologico; Cassa rifiuti chimici; Cassa rifiuti farmaceutici; Cassa rifiuti radioattivi; Sharps cassa
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Artigos para o lar > Eliminação de resíduos > Contentores de resíduos perigosos: Recipientes para resíduos biológicos; Recipientes para resíduos químicos; Recipientes para resíduos farmacêuticos; Recipientes para resíduos radioativos; Recipientes para objetos cortantes
ru: Дом и сад > Хозяйственные товары > Емкости для сбора отходов > Контейнеры для опасных отходов: Контейнер для биологически опасных отходов; Контейнер для химических отходов; Контейнер для фармацевтических отходов; Контейнер для радиоактивных отходов; Контейнер для острых предметов
cs: Dům a zahrada > Potřeby pro domácnosti > Odpadní nádoby > Nádoby na nebezpečný odpad: Kontejnery na biologicky nebezpečný odpad; Kontejnery na chemický odpad; Kontejnery na farmaceutický odpad; Kontejnery na radioaktivní odpad; Nádoby na ostré předměty
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Namų apyvokos reikmenys > Atliekų surinkimas > Pavojingų atliekų konteineriai: Biologiškai pavojingų atliekų konteineris; Cheminių atliekų konteineris; Farmacinių atliekų konteineris; Radioaktyviųjų atliekų konteineris; Aštrių daiktų konteineriai
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 居家生活用品 > 垃圾桶 > 有害廢棄物儲藏桶: 生物危害廢棄物儲藏桶; 化學廢棄物儲藏桶; 醫藥廢棄物儲藏桶; 放射性廢棄物儲藏桶; 利器收集盒
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Είδη οικιακής χρήσης > Διαχείριση απορριμμάτων > Δοχεία επικίνδυνων απορριμμάτων: Δοχεία βιολογικών αποβλήτων; Δοχεία χημικών αποβλήτων; Δοχεία φαρμακευτικών αποβλήτων; Δοχεία ραδιενεργών αποβλήτων; Δοχεία απόρριψης αιχμηρών αντικειμένων
pl: Dom i ogród > Artykuły gospodarstwa domowego > Przechowywanie śmieci > Pojemniki na odpady niebezpieczne: Pojemniki na odpady niebezpieczne; Pojemniki na odpady chemiczne; Pojemniki na odpady farmaceutyczne; Pojemniki na odpady radioaktywne; Pojemniki na ostre przedmioty
th: บ้านและสวน > อุปกรณ์ใช้ในบ้าน > ถังขยะ > ที่เก็บขยะอันตราย: ภาชนะเก็บขยะอันตรายทางชีวภาพ; ภาชนะเก็บขยะเคมี; ภาชนะใส่ขยะเภสัชภัณฑ์; ภาชนะเก็บขยะกัมมันตภาพรังสี; ภาชนะสำหรับทิ้งของมีคม
es: Casa y jardín > Productos del hogar > Contenedores de residuos > Contenedores de residuos peligrosos: Contenedores de residuos de riesgo biológico; Contenedores de residuos químicos; Contenedores de residuos farmacéuticos; Contenedores de residuos radiactivos; Contenedores para objetos punzantes
hu: Otthon és kert > Háztartási kellékek > Hulladékelszigetelés > Veszélyeshulladék-konténerek: Biológiai veszélyes hulladék tartályok; Vegyi hulladék tartályok; Gyógyszeripari hulladék tartályok; Radioaktív hulladék tartályok; Éles eszközök hulladéktartályai
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Suprimentos domésticos > Contenção de resíduos > Recipientes para resíduos perigosos: Recipientes para resíduos biológicos; Recipientes para resíduos químicos; Recipientes para resíduos farmacêuticos; Recipientes para resíduos radioativos; Recipientes para perfurocortantes
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Gospodinjski pripomočki > Shranjevanje odpadkov > Zabojniki za nevarne odpadke: Zabojniki za biološko nevarne odpadke; Zabojniki za kemične odpadke; Zabojniki za farmacevtske odpadke; Zabojniki za radioaktivne odpadke; Posode za ostre predmete
nl: Huis en tuin > Huishoudelijke benodigdheden > Afvalverwerking > Containers voor chemisch afval: Containers voor biologisch gevaarlijk afval; Containers voor chemisch afval; Containers voor farmaceutisch afval; Containers voor radioactief afval; Naaldencontainers
de: Heim & Garten > Haushaltsbedarf > Abfallbehälter > Sondermüllbehälter: Behälter für biologische Gefahrenstoffe; Chemikalienabfallbehälter; Behälter für pharmazeutische Abfälle; Behälter für radioaktive Abfälle; Behälter für scharfe Gegenstände
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Potreby pre domácnosť > Nakladanie s odpadom > Nádoby na nebezpečný odpad: Nádoby na biologický odpad; Nádoby na chemický odpad; Nádoby na farmaceutický odpad; Nádoby na rádioaktívny odpad; Nádoby na ostré predmety
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Kotitaloustarvikkeet > Jätteiden käsittely > Vaarallisen jätteen astiat: Biovaarallisen jätteen astiat; Kemiallisen jätteen astiat; Lääkejätteen astiat; Radioaktiivisen jätteen astiat; Terävän jätteen astiat
fr: Maison et jardin > Produits ménagers > Conditionnement des déchets > Conteneurs pour déchets dangereux: Conteneur à déchets bio-dangereux; Conteneur à déchets chimiques; Conteneur à déchets pharmaceutiques; Conteneur à déchets radioactifs; Conteneurs pour objets tranchants
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 家居用品 > 垃圾收纳 > 危险废品容器: 生物危害废物容器; 化学废物容器; 药品废物容器; 放射性废物容器; 锐器废物容器
ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 생활용품 > 폐기물 매립 > 유독 폐기물 보관함: 생물학적 위험 폐기물 용기; 화학 폐기물 용기; 의약 폐기물 용기; 방사성 폐기물 용기; 의료용 날카로운 폐기물 용기